District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.02

Establishment of the Department of Health Care Finance.

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), there is established a Department of Health Care Finance as a separate, cabinet-level agency, subordinate to the Mayor, within the executive branch of the government of the District of Columbia.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 3, 55 DCR 216
This section is referenced in § 7-771.01.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5014 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5014 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For Department of Health Care Finance reporting requirements to Council, see § 5013 of D.C. Law 19-168.